Florida, session 2026, SB488.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 119 120 Section 1.âSection 207.001, Florida Statutes, is amended to 121 read: 122 207.001âShort title.âThis chapter shall be known as the 123 âFlorida Diesel Fuel and Motor Fuel Use Tax Act of 1981,â and 124 the taxes levied under this chapter shall be in addition to all 125 other taxes imposed by law. 126 Section 2.âSection 207.002, Florida Statutes, is amended to 127 read: 128 207.002âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter, the term: 129 (1)(2)ââDepartmentâ means the Department of Highway Safety 130 and Motor Vehicles. 131 (2)ââInternational Fuel Tax Agreementâ means the reciprocal 132 agreement among certain states of the United States, provinces 133 of Canada, and other member jurisdictions which provides for the 134 administration, collection, and enforcement of taxes on the 135 basis of fuel consumed or distance accrued, or both, in member 136 jurisdictions. 137 (3)ââDiesel fuelâ means any liquid product or gas product 138 or combination thereof, including, but not limited to, all forms 139 of fuel known or sold as diesel fuel, kerosene, butane gas, or 140 propane gas and all other forms of liquefied petroleum gases, 141 except those defined as âmotor fuel,â used to propel a motor 142 vehicle. 143 (4)ââInternational Registration Planâ means a registration 144 reciprocity agreement among states of the United States and 145 provinces of Canada providing for payment of license fees or 146 license taxes on the basis of fleet miles operated in various 147 jurisdictions. 148 (3)(5)ââInterstateâ means vehicle movement between or 149 through two or more member jurisdictions states. 150 (4)(6)ââIntrastateâ means vehicle movement from one point 151 within a member jurisdiction state to another point within the 152 same member jurisdiction state. 153 (5)ââMember jurisdictionâ means a member of the 154 International Fuel Tax Agreement. 155 (6)(7)ââMotor carrierâ means any person owning, 156 controlling, operating, or managing any motor vehicle used to 157 transport persons or property over any public highway. 158 (7)(8)ââMotor fuelâ means any fuel placed in the fuel 159 supply storage unit of a qualified motor vehicle, including an 160 alternative fuel such as pure methanol, ethanol, or other 161 alcohol; a blend of 85 percent or more alcohol with gasoline; 162 natural gas and liquid fuel produced from natural gas; propane; 163 coal-derived liquified fuel; hydrogen; electricity; pure 164 biodiesel (B100) fuel, other than alcohol, derived from 165 biological materials; P-series fuel; or any other type of fuel 166 or energy used to propel a qualified motor vehicle what is 167 commonly known and sold as gasoline and fuels containing a 168 mixture of gasoline and other products. 169 (8)(9)ââOperate,â âoperated,â âoperation,â or âoperatingâ 170 means and includes the use utilization in any form of any 171 qualified commercial motor vehicle, whether loaded or empty, 172 whether used utilized for compensation or not for compensation, 173 and whether owned by or leased to the motor carrier who uses it 174 or causes it to be used. 175 (9)(10)ââPersonâ means and includes natural persons, 176 corporations, copartnerships, firms, companies, agencies, or 177 associations, singular or plural. 178 (10)(11)ââPublic highwayâ means any public street, road, or 179 highway in this state. 180 (11)(1)ââQualified commercial motor vehicleâ means any 181 vehicle not owned or operated by a governmental entity which 182 uses diesel fuel or motor fuel on the public highways; and which 183 has two axles and a gross vehicle weight or registered gross 184 vehicle weight in excess of 26,000 pounds, or has three or more 185 axles regardless of weight, or is used in combination when the 186 weight of such combination exceeds 26,000 pounds gross vehicle 187 weight or registered gross vehicle weight. The term excludes any 188 recreational vehicle or vehicle owned or operated by a community 189 transportation coordinator as defined in s. 427.011 or by a 190 private operator that provides public transit services under 191 contract with such a provider. 192 (12)ââRegistrantâ means a person in whose name or names a 193 vehicle is properly registered. 194 (12)(13)ââUse,â âuses,â or âusedâ means the consumption of 195 diesel fuel or motor fuel in a qualified commercial motor 196 vehicle for the propulsion thereof. 197 Section 3.âSection 207.004, Florida Statutes, is amended to 198 read: 199 207.004âLicensing registration of motor carriers; fuel tax 200 decals identifying devices; fees; renewals; temporary fuel-use 201 permits and driveaway permits.â 202 (1)(a)âA no motor carrier may not shall operate or cause to 203 be operated in this state any qualified commercial motor 204 vehicle, other than a Florida-based qualified commercial motor 205 vehicle that travels Florida intrastate mileage only, which that 206 uses diesel fuel or motor fuel until such carrier is licensed 207 has registered with the department or has registered under the 208 International Fuel Tax Agreement a cooperative reciprocal 209 agreement as described in s. 207.0281, after such time as this 210 state enters into such agreement, and has been issued fuel tax 211 decals an identifying device or such carrier has been issued a 212 temporary fuel-use permit as authorized under subsection 213 subsections (4) and (5) for each vehicle operated. The fee for 214 each set of fuel tax decals is There shall be a fee of $4 per 215 year or any fraction thereof. A copy of the license must be 216 carried in each vehicle or made available electronically. The 217 fuel tax decal for each such identifying device issued. The 218 identifying device shall be provided by the department and must 219 be conspicuously displayed on the qualified commercial motor 220 vehicle as prescribed by the instructions on the reverse side of 221 the decal department while the vehicle it is being operated on 222 the public highways of this state. The transfer of a fuel tax 223 decal an identifying device from one vehicle to another vehicle 224 or from one motor carrier to another motor carrier is 225 prohibited. The department or its authorized agent shall issue 226 the licenses and fuel tax decals. 227 (b)âThe motor carrier to whom fuel tax decals have an 228 identifying device has been issued is shall be solely 229 responsible for the proper use of the fuel tax decals 230 identifying device by its employees, consignees, or lessees. 231 (2)âFuel tax decals Identifying devices shall be issued 232 each year for the period January 1 through December 31, or any 233 portion thereof, if tax returns and tax payments, when 234 applicable, have been submitted to the department for all prior 235 reporting periods. Fuel tax decals Identifying devices may be 236 displayed for the next succeeding indicia period beginning 237 December 1 of each year. Beginning October 1, 2026, except as 238 otherwise authorized by the department, all fuel tax decal 239 renewal orders must be submitted electronically through an 240 online system prescribed by the department. 241 (3)âIf a motor carrier licensed in this state no longer 242 operates or causes to be operated in this state any qualified a 243 commercial motor vehicle, the fuel tax decal for each qualified 244 motor vehicle that is no longer operated or caused to be 245 operated by the motor carrier must identifying device shall be 246 destroyed and the motor carrier to whom the fuel tax decal 247 device was issued must shall notify the department immediately 248 by letter of such removal and of the number of the fuel tax 249 decal identifying device that was has been destroyed. 250 (4)âA motor carrier, before operating a qualified 251 commercial motor vehicle on the public highways of this state, 252 must require each qualified motor vehicle to display a fuel tax 253 decal an identifying device as required under subsections (1) 254 and (2) or must obtain a temporary fuel-use permit for that 255 vehicle as provided in subsection (5). A temporary fuel-use 256 permit shall expire within 10 days after date of issuance. The 257 cost of a temporary fuel-use permit is $45, and the permit 258 exempts the vehicle from the payment of the motor fuel or diesel 259 fuel tax imposed under this chapter during the term for which 260 the permit is valid. However, the vehicle is not exempt from 261 paying the fuel tax at the pump. 262 (5)(a)âA registered motor carrier holding a valid license 263 may certificate of registration may, upon payment of the $45 fee 264 per permit, secure from the department, or any wire service 265 authorized by the department, a temporary fuel-use permit. 266 (b)âThe fee for a temporary fuel-use permit is $45. A 267 temporary fuel-use permit expires 10 days after the date of 268 issuance and exempts the vehicle from payment of the motor fuel 269 tax imposed under this chapter during the period for which the 270 permit is valid. However, this paragraph does not exempt the 271 vehicle from payment at the pump of the fuel tax imposed under 272 chapter 206. 273 (c)âA blank temporary fuel-use permit, before its use, must 274 be executed by the motor carrier, in ink or type, so as to 275 identify the carrier, the vehicle to which the permit is 276 assigned, and the permitâs effective date and expiration date 277 that the vehicle is placed in and removed from service. The 278 temporary fuel-use permit shall also show a complete 279 identification of the vehicle on which the permit is to be used, 280 together with the name and address of the owner or lessee of the 281 vehicle. The endorsed temporary fuel-use permit must shall then 282 be carried on the vehicle that it identifies and must shall be 283 exhibited on demand to any authorized personnel. Temporary fuel 284 use permits may be transmitted to the motor carrier by 285 electronic means and shall be completed as outlined by 286 department personnel prior to transmittal. 287 (d)âThe motor carrier to whom a temporary fuel-use permit 288 is issued is shall be solely responsible for the proper use of 289 the permit by its employees, consignees, or lessees. Any 290 erasure, alteration, or unauthorized use of a temporary fuel-use 291 permit renders shall render it invalid and of no effect. A motor 292 carrier to whom a temporary fuel-use permit is issued may not 293 knowingly allow the permit to be used by any other person or 294 organization. 295 (b)âAn unregistered motor carrier may, upon payment of the 296 $45 fee, secure from any wire service authorized by the 297 department, by electronic means, a temporary fuel-use permit 298 that shall be valid for a period of 10 days. Such permit must 299 show the name and address of the unregistered motor carrier to 300 whom it is issued, the date the vehicle is placed in and removed 301 from service, a complete identification of the vehicle on which 302 the permit is to be used, and the name and address of the owner 303 or lessee of the vehicle. The temporary fuel-use permit shall 304 then be carried on the vehicle that it identifies and shall be 305 exhibited on demand to any authorized personnel. The 306 unregistered motor carrier to whom a temporary fuel-use permit 307 is issued shall be solely responsible for the proper use of the 308 permit by its employees, consignees, or lessees. Any erasure, 309 alteration, or unauthorized use of a temporary fuel-use permit 310 shall render it invalid and of no effect. The unregistered motor 311 carrier to whom a temporary fuel-use permit is issued may not 312 knowingly allow the permit to be used by any other person or 313 organization. 314 (c)âA registered motor carrier engaged in driveaway 315 transportation, in which the cargo is the vehicle itself and is 316 in transit to stock inventory and the ownership of the vehicle 317 is not vested in the motor carrier, may, upon payment of the $4 318 fee, secure from the department a driveaway permit. The 319 driveaway permits shall be issued for the period January 1 320 through December 31. An original permit must be in the 321 possession of the operator of each vehicle and shall be 322 exhibited on demand to any authorized personnel. Vehicle mileage 323 reports must be submitted by the motor carrier, and the road 324 privilege tax must be paid on all miles operated within this 325 state during the reporting period. All other provisions of this 326 chapter shall apply to the holder of a driveaway permit. 327 Section 4.âSection 207.005, Florida Statutes, is amended to 328 read: 329 207.005âReturns and payment of tax; delinquencies; 330 calculation of fuel used during operations in this the state; 331 credit; bond.â 332 (1)âThe taxes levied under this chapter are shall be due 333 and payable on the first day of the month following the last 334 month of the reporting period. The department may adopt 335 promulgate rules for requiring and establishing procedures for 336 annual, semiannual, or quarterly filing. The reporting period is 337 shall be the 12 months beginning January July 1 and ending 338 December 31 June 30. It shall be the duty of Each motor carrier 339 licensed registered or required to be licensed registered under 340 the provisions of this chapter must to submit a return by the 341 following due dates, except that each due date is extended until 342 the last day of the month of the due date, and, if the last day 343 of the month falls on a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the 344 due date is further extended until the next day that is not a 345 Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday within 30 days after the due 346 date. The due date shall be as follows: 347 (a)âIf annual filing, the due date is January 31 shall be 348 July 1; 349 (b)âIf semiannual filing, the due dates are shall be 350 January 31 1 and July 31 1; or 351 (c)âIf quarterly filing, the due dates are shall be January 352 31 1, April 30 1, July 31 1, and October 31 1. 353 (2)âThe amount of fuel used in the propulsion of any 354 qualified commercial motor vehicle within this state may be 355 calculated, if the motor carrier maintains adequate records, by 356 applying total interstate vehicular consumption of all diesel 357 fuel and motor fuel used as related to total miles traveled and 358 applying such rate to total miles traveled within this state. In 359 the absence of adequate documentation by the motor carrier, the 360 department may adopt is authorized to promulgate rules 361 converting miles driven to gallons used. 362 (3)âFor the purpose of computing the carrierâs liability 363 for the fuel road privilege tax, the total gallons of fuel used 364 in the propulsion of any qualified commercial motor vehicle in 365 this state shall be multiplied by the rates provided in parts I 366 III of chapter 206. From the sum determined by this calculation, 367 there shall be allowed a credit equal to the amount of the tax 368 per gallon under parts I-III of chapter 206 for each gallon of 369 fuel purchased in this state during the reporting period when 370 the diesel fuel or motor fuel tax was paid at the time of 371 purchase. If the tax paid under parts I-III of chapter 206 372 exceeds the total tax due under this chapter, the excess may be 373 allowed as a credit against future tax payments, until the 374 credit is fully offset or until eight calendar quarters shall 375 have passed since the end of the calendar quarter in which the 376 credit accrued, whichever occurs first. A refund may be made for 377 this credit provided it exceeds $10. 378 (4)âThe department may adopt is authorized to promulgate 379 the necessary rules to provide for an adequate bond from each 380 motor carrier to ensure payment of taxes required under this 381 chapter. 382 (5)âBeginning October 1, 2026, except as otherwise 383 authorized by the department, all returns must be submitted 384 electronically through an online system prescribed by the 385 department. 386 Section 5.âSection 207.007, Florida Statutes, is amended to 387 read: 388 207.007âOffenses; penalties and interest.â 389 (1)âIf any motor carrier licensed registered under this 390 chapter fails to file a return or and pay any tax liability 391 under this chapter within the time required hereunder, the 392 department may impose a delinquency penalty of $50 or 10 percent 393 of the delinquent taxes due, whichever is greater, if the 394 failure is for not more than 30 days, with an additional 10 395 percent penalty for each additional 30 days, or fraction 396 thereof, during the time which the failure continues, not to 397 exceed a total penalty of 100 percent in the aggregate. However, 398 the penalty may not be less than $50. 399 (2)âIn addition to any other penalties, any delinquent tax 400 shall bear interest in accordance with the International Fuel 401 Tax Agreement at the rate of 1 percent per month, or fraction 402 thereof, calculated from the date the tax was due. If the 403 department enters into a cooperative reciprocal agreement under 404 the provisions of s. 207.0281, the department shall collect and 405 distribute all interest due to other jurisdictions at the same 406 rate as if such interest were due to the state. 407 (3)âAny person who: 408 (a)âWillfully refuses or neglects to make any statement, 409 report, or return required by the provisions of this chapter; 410 (b)âKnowingly makes, or assists any other person in making, 411 a false statement in a return or report or in connection with an 412 application for licensure registration under this chapter or in 413 connection with an audit; or 414 (c)âCounterfeits, alters, manufactures, or sells fuel tax 415 licenses, fuel tax decals, or temporary fuel-use permits without 416 first having obtained the departmentâs permission in writing; or 417 (d)(c)âViolates any provision of the provisions of this 418 chapter, a penalty for which is not otherwise provided, 419 420 commits is guilty of a felony of the third degree, punishable as 421 provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. In addition, 422 the department may revoke or suspend the licensure and 423 registration privileges under ss. 207.004 and 320.02, 424 respectively, of the violator. Each day or part thereof during 425 which a person operates or causes to be operated a qualified 426 commercial motor vehicle without being the holder of fuel tax 427 decals an identifying device or having a valid temporary fuel 428 use or driveaway permit as required by this chapter constitutes 429 a separate offense within the meaning of this section. In 430 addition to the penalty imposed by this section, the defendant 431 is shall be required to pay all taxes, interest, and penalties 432 due to this the state. 433 Section 6.âSubsection (1) of section 207.019, Florida 434 Statutes, is amended to read: 435 207.019âDiscontinuance or transfer of business; change of 436 address.â 437 (1)âWhenever a person ceases to engage in business as a 438 motor carrier within this the state by reason of the 439 discontinuance, sale, or transfer of the business of such 440 person, the person he or she shall notify the department in 441 writing at least 10 days before prior to the time the 442 discontinuance, sale, or transfer takes effect. Such notice must 443 shall give the date of discontinuance and, in the event of a 444 sale or transfer of the business, the date thereof and the name 445 and address of the purchaser or transferee. All diesel fuel or 446 motor fuel use taxes are shall become due and payable 447 concurrently with such discontinuance, sale, or transfer; and 448 any such person shall, concurrently with such discontinuance, 449 sale, or transfer, make a report and, pay all such taxes, 450 interest, and penalties; and the fuel tax decals must be 451 destroyed and the motor carrier to whom the decals were issued 452 shall notify the department by letter of their destruction and 453 of the numbers of the fuel tax decals that were destroyed, and 454 surrender to the department the registration issued to such 455 person. 456 Section 7.âSubsection (1) of section 316.065, Florida 457 Statutes, is amended to read: 458 316.065âCrashes; reports; penalties.â 459 (1)âThe driver of a vehicle involved in a crash resulting 460 in injury to or death of any persons or damage to any vehicle or 461 other property in an apparent amount of at least $2,000 $500 462 shall immediately by the quickest means of communication give 463 notice of the crash to the local police department, if such 464 crash occurs within a municipality; otherwise, to the office of 465 the county sheriff or the nearest office or station of the 466 Florida Highway Patrol. A violation of this subsection is a 467 noncriminal traffic infraction, punishable as a nonmoving 468 violation as provided in chapter 318. 469 Section 8.âSubsection (2) and paragraph (e) of subsection 470 (5) of section 320.02, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 471 320.02âRegistration required; application for registration; 472 forms.â 473 (2)(a)âThe application for registration must include the 474 street address of the ownerâs permanent Florida residence or the 475 address of his or her permanent place of business in Florida and 476 be accompanied by personal or business identification 477 information. If the vehicle is registered to an active duty 478 member of the United States Armed Forces who is a Florida 479 resident, the active duty member is not required to provide the 480 street address of a permanent Florida residence. 481 (b)âAn individual applicant must provide proof of address 482 satisfactory to the department and: 483 1.âA valid REAL ID driver license or identification card 484 issued by this state or another state; or 485 2.âA valid, unexpired United States passport; or 486 3.âA valid, unexpired passport issued by another country 487 and an unexpired Form I-94 issued by the United States Bureau of 488 Customs and Border Protection. 489 490 For purposes of this paragraph, the term âREAL ID driver license 491 or identification cardâ has the same meaning as provided in 6 492 C.F.R. s. 37.3. 493 (c)âA business applicant must provide a federal employer 494 identification number, if applicable, or verification that the 495 business is authorized to conduct business in this the state, or 496 a Florida municipal or county business license or number. 497 1.âIf the owner does not have a permanent residence or 498 permanent place of business or if the ownerâs permanent 499 residence or permanent place of business cannot be identified by 500 a street address, the application must include: 501 a.âIf the vehicle is registered to a business, the name and 502 street address of the permanent residence of an owner of the 503 business, an officer of the corporation, or an employee who is 504 in a supervisory position. 505 b.âIf the vehicle is registered to an individual, the name 506 and street address of the permanent residence of a close 507 relative or friend who is a resident of this state. 508 2.âIf the vehicle is registered to an active duty member of 509 the Armed Forces of the United States who is a Florida resident, 510 the active duty member is exempt from the requirement to provide 511 the street address of a permanent residence. 512 (d)(b)âThe department shall prescribe a form upon which 513 motor vehicle owners may record odometer readings when 514 registering their motor vehicles. 515 (5) 516 (e)âUpon the expiration date noted in the cancellation 517 notice that the department receives from the insurer, the 518 department shall suspend the registration, issued under this 519 chapter or revoke the license issued under s. 207.004(1), of a 520 motor carrier who operates a commercial motor vehicle or a 521 qualified motor vehicle who permits it to be operated in this 522 state during the registration period or licensure period without 523 having in full force liability insurance, a surety bond, or a 524 valid self-insurance certificate that complies with this 525 section. The insurer shall provide notice to the department at 526 the same time the cancellation notice is provided to the insured 527 pursuant to s. 627.7281. The department may adopt rules 528 regarding the electronic submission of the cancellation notice. 529 Section 9.âSection 320.061, Florida Statutes, is amended to 530 read: 531 320.061âUnlawful to alter motor vehicle registration 532 certificates, license plates, temporary license plates, mobile 533 home stickers, or validation stickers or to obscure license 534 plates; penalty.â 535 (1)âA person may not alter the original appearance of a 536 vehicle registration certificate, license plate, temporary 537 license plate, mobile home sticker, or validation sticker issued 538 for and assigned to a motor vehicle or mobile home, whether by 539 mutilation, alteration, defacement, or change of color or in any 540 other manner. A person may not apply or attach a substance, 541 reflective matter, illuminated device, spray, coating, covering, 542 or other material onto or around any license plate which 543 interferes with the legibility, angular visibility, or 544 detectability of any feature or detail on the license plate 545 number or validation sticker or interferes with the ability to 546 record any feature or detail on the license plate number or 547 validation sticker. A person who knowingly violates this section 548 commits a misdemeanor of the second degree, punishable as 549 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083. 550 (2)âThe use of a license plate frame or decorative border 551 around a license plate is not an offense under this section, 552 provided that the frame or border does not obscure the 553 visibility of the following: 554 (a)âThe alphanumeric designation or license plate number. 555 (b)âThe registration decal or validation sticker located in 556 the upper right corner. 557 Section 10.âSubsection (3) of section 320.084, Florida 558 Statutes, is amended to read: 559 320.084âFree motor vehicle license plate to certain 560 disabled veterans.â 561 (3)âThe department shall, as it deems necessary, require 562 each person to whom a motor vehicle license plate has been 563 issued pursuant to subsection (1) to apply to the department for 564 reissuance of his or her registration license plate. Upon 565 receipt of the application and proof of the applicantâs 566 continued eligibility, the department shall issue a new 567 permanent disabled veteran motor vehicle license plate which 568 shall be of the colors red, white, and blue similar to the 569 colors of the United States flag. A disabled veteran who has 570 been issued a permanent disabled veteran motor vehicle license 571 plate may retain the unique alphanumeric designation assigned to 572 the plate upon reissuance, renewal, or transfer of the plate to 573 another vehicle owned by the veteran. The operation of a motor 574 vehicle displaying a disabled veteran license plate from a 575 previous issue period or a noncurrent validation sticker after 576 the date specified by the department shall subject the owner if 577 he or she is present, otherwise the operator, to the penalty 578 provided in s. 318.18(2). Such permanent license plate shall be 579 removed upon sale of the vehicle, but may be transferred to 580 another vehicle owned by such veteran in the manner prescribed 581 by law. Upon request of any such veteran, the department is 582 authorized to issue a designation plate containing only the 583 letters âDV,â to be displayed on the front of the vehicle. 584 Section 11.âSection 320.0843, Florida Statutes, is amended 585 to read: 586 320.0843âLicense plates for persons with disabilities 587 eligible for permanent disabled parking permits.â 588 (1)âAny owner or lessee of a motor vehicle who resides in 589 this state and qualifies for a disabled parking permit under s. 590 320.0848(2), upon application to the department, or the tax 591 collector as an authorized agent of the department, and payment 592 of the license tax for a motor vehicle registered under s. 593 320.08(2), (3)(a), (b), (c), or (e), (4)(a) or (b), (6)(a), or 594 (9)(c) or (d), shall be issued a license plate as provided by s. 595 320.06 which, in lieu of or in addition to the serial number 596 prescribed by s. 320.06, shall, at the option of the applicant, 597 be stamped with the international wheelchair user symbol or the 598 letters âDVâ indicating a disabled veteran after the serial 599 number of the license plate. The license plate entitles the 600 person to all privileges afforded by a parking permit issued 601 under s. 320.0848. When more than one registrant is listed on 602 the registration issued under this section, the eligible 603 applicant shall be noted on the registration certificate. 604 (2)âAll applications for such license plates may must be 605 made to the department or the tax collector, and such plates may 606 be issued immediately on demand by the tax collector. 607 Section 12.âParagraphs (c) and (d) of subsection (1) of 608 section 320.262, Florida Statutes, are amended, and subsection 609 (5) is added to that section, to read: 610 320.262âLicense plate obscuring device prohibited; 611 penalties.â 612 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âlicense plate 613 obscuring deviceâ means a manual, electronic, or mechanical 614 device designed or adapted to be installed on a motor vehicle 615 for the purpose of: 616 (c)âCovering, obscuring, or otherwise interfering with the 617 legibility, angular visibility, or detectability of the primary 618 features or details, including the license plate number or 619 validation sticker, on the license plate; or 620 (d)âInterfering with the ability to record the primary 621 features or details, including the license plate number or 622 validation sticker, on the license plate. 623 (5)âThe use of a license plate frame or decorative border 624 device is not an offense under this section, provided that the 625 device does not obscure the visibility of the following: 626 (a)âThe alphanumeric designation or license plate number. 627 (b)âThe registration decal or validation sticker located in 628 the upper right corner. 629 Section 13.âSubsection (16) and paragraph (a) of subsection 630 (36) of section 320.64, Florida Statutes, are amended, and 631 subsection (44) is added to that section, to read: 632 320.64âDenial, suspension, or revocation of license; 633 grounds.âA license of a licensee under s. 320.61 may be denied, 634 suspended, or revoked within the entire state or at any specific 635 location or locations within the state at which the applicant or 636 licensee engages or proposes to engage in business, upon proof 637 that the section was violated with sufficient frequency to 638 establish a pattern of wrongdoing, and a licensee or applicant 639 shall be liable for claims and remedies provided in ss. 320.695 640 and 320.697 for any violation of any of the following 641 provisions. A licensee is prohibited from committing the 642 following acts: 643 (16)(a)âNotwithstanding the terms of any franchise 644 agreement, the applicant or licensee prevents or refuses to 645 accept the succession to any interest in a franchise agreement 646 by any legal heir or devisee under the will of a motor vehicle 647 dealer or under the laws of descent and distribution of this 648 state; provided, the applicant or licensee is not required to 649 accept a succession: 650 1.âWhen where such heir or devisee does not meet licenseeâs 651 written, reasonable, and uniformly applied minimal standard 652 qualifications for dealer applicants; 653 2.âor Which, after notice and administrative hearing 654 pursuant to chapter 120, is demonstrated to be detrimental to 655 the public interest or to the representation of the applicant or 656 licensee; or 657 3.âWhen the direct result of such succession will cause the 658 applicant or licensee to be in violation of subsection (44). 659 (b)âThis subsection does not Nothing contained herein, 660 however, shall prevent a motor vehicle dealer, during his or her 661 lifetime, from designating any person as his or her successor in 662 interest by written instrument filed with and accepted by the 663 applicant or licensee. A licensee who rejects the successor 664 transferee under this subsection shall have the burden of 665 establishing in any proceeding where such rejection is in issue 666 that the rejection of the successor transferee complies with 667 this subsection. 668 (36)(a)âNotwithstanding the terms of any franchise 669 agreement, in addition to any other statutory or contractual 670 rights of recovery after the voluntary or involuntary 671 termination, cancellation, or nonrenewal of a franchise, failing 672 to pay the motor vehicle dealer, as provided in paragraph (d), 673 the following amounts: 674 1.âThe net cost paid by the dealer for each new motor 675 vehicle other than motorcycles car or truck in the dealerâs 676 inventory with mileage of 2,000 miles or less, or each new a 677 motorcycle in the dealerâs inventory with mileage of 100 miles 678 or less, exclusive of mileage placed on the motor vehicle before 679 it was delivered to the dealer. 680 2.âThe current price charged for each new, unused, 681 undamaged, or unsold part or accessory that: 682 a.âIs in the current parts catalog and is still in the 683 original, resalable merchandising package and in an unbroken 684 lot, except that sheet metal may be in a comparable substitute 685 for the original package; and 686 b.âWas purchased by the dealer directly from the 687 manufacturer or distributor or from an outgoing authorized 688 dealer as a part of the dealerâs initial inventory. 689 3.âThe fair market value of each undamaged sign owned by 690 the dealer which bears a trademark or trade name used or claimed 691 by the applicant or licensee or its representative which was 692 purchased from or at the request of the applicant or licensee or 693 its representative. 694 4.âThe fair market value of all special tools, data 695 processing equipment, and automotive service equipment owned by 696 the dealer which: 697 a.âWere recommended in writing by the applicant or licensee 698 or its representative and designated as special tools and 699 equipment; 700 b.âWere purchased from or at the request of the applicant 701 or licensee or its representative; and 702 c.âAre in usable and good condition except for reasonable 703 wear and tear. 704 5.âThe cost of transporting, handling, packing, storing, 705 and loading any property subject to repurchase under this 706 section. 707 (44)(a)âThe applicant or licensee has directly or 708 indirectly distributed 1,000 or more motor vehicles of a 709 particular line-make to motor vehicle dealers in this state 710 during any 12-month period and has directly or indirectly 711 distributed more than 33.33 percent of those same line-make 712 motor vehicles during that 12-month period to one motor vehicle 713 dealer or to multiple motor vehicle dealers that share common 714 ownership or control. For purposes of this subsection, a motor 715 vehicle dealer shares common ownership or control with another 716 motor vehicle dealer if: 717 1.âIt is directly or indirectly controlled by or has more 718 than 30 percent of its equity interest directly or indirectly 719 owned by another motor vehicle dealer; or 720 2.âIt has more than 30 percent of its equity interest 721 directly or indirectly controlled or owned by one or more 722 persons who also directly or indirectly control or own more than 723 30 percent of the equity interests of another motor vehicle 724 dealer. 725 (b)âThis subsection does not apply to any line-make of 726 motor vehicle for which there exists a licensed franchised 727 dealer in this state as of January 1, 2026, or to an applicant 728 or licensee who is not prohibited by s. 320.645 from owning or 729 operating a motor vehicle dealership. 730 731 A motor vehicle dealer who can demonstrate that a violation of, 732 or failure to comply with, any of the preceding provisions by an 733 applicant or licensee will or may adversely and pecuniarily 734 affect the complaining dealer, shall be entitled to pursue all 735 of the remedies, procedures, and rights of recovery available 736 under ss. 320.695 and 320.697. 737 Section 14.âSubsections (1) and (2) of section 320.643, 738 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 739 320.643âTransfer, assignment, or sale of franchise 740 agreements.â 741 (1)(a)âNotwithstanding the terms of any franchise 742 agreement, a licensee may shall not, by contract or otherwise, 743 fail or refuse to give effect to, prevent, prohibit, or penalize 744 or attempt to refuse to give effect to, prohibit, or penalize 745 any motor vehicle dealer from selling, assigning, transferring, 746 alienating, or otherwise disposing of its franchise agreement to 747 any other person or persons, including a corporation established 748 or existing for the purpose of owning or holding a franchise 749 agreement, unless the licensee proves at a hearing pursuant to a 750 complaint filed by a motor vehicle dealer under this section 751 that the sale, transfer, alienation, or other disposition: 752 1.âIs to a person who is not, or whose controlling 753 executive management is not, of good moral character; 754 2.âIs to a person who or does not meet the written, 755 reasonable, and uniformly applied standards or qualifications of 756 the licensee relating to financial qualifications of the 757 transferee and business experience of the transferee or the 758 transfereeâs executive management; or 759 3.âWould directly cause the licensee to be in violation of 760 s. 320.64(44). 761 (b)âA motor vehicle dealer who desires to sell, assign, 762 transfer, alienate, or otherwise dispose of a franchise shall 763 notify, or cause the proposed transferee to notify, the 764 licensee, in writing, setting forth the prospective transfereeâs 765 name, address, financial qualifications, and business experience 766 during the previous 5 years. A licensee who receives such notice 767 may, within 60 days following such receipt, notify the motor 768 vehicle dealer, in writing, that the proposed transferee is not 769 a person qualified to be a transferee under this section and 770 setting forth the material reasons for such rejection. Failure 771 of the licensee to notify the motor vehicle dealer within the 772 60-day period of such rejection shall be deemed an approval of 773 the transfer. No such transfer, assignment, or sale shall be 774 valid unless the transferee agrees in writing to comply with all 775 requirements of the franchise then in effect, but with the 776 ownership changed to the transferee. 777 (c)(b)âA motor vehicle dealer whose proposed sale is 778 rejected may, within 60 days following such receipt of such 779 rejection, file with the department a complaint for a 780 determination that the proposed transferee has been rejected in 781 violation of this section. The licensee has the burden of proof 782 with respect to all issues raised by the complaint. The 783 department shall determine, and enter an order providing, that 784 the proposed transferee is either qualified or is not and cannot 785 be qualified for specified reasons, or the order may provide the 786 conditions under which a proposed transferee would be qualified. 787 If the licensee fails to file such a response to the motor 788 vehicle dealerâs complaint within 30 days after receipt of the 789 complaint, unless the parties agree in writing to an extension, 790 or if the department, after a hearing, renders a decision other 791 than one disqualifying the proposed transferee, the franchise 792 agreement between the motor vehicle dealer and the licensee is 793 deemed amended to incorporate such transfer or amended in 794 accordance with the determination and order rendered, effective 795 upon compliance by the proposed transferee with any conditions 796 set forth in the determination or order. 797 (2)(a)âNotwithstanding the terms of any franchise 798 agreement, a licensee may shall not, by contract or otherwise, 799 fail or refuse to give effect to, prevent, prohibit, or 800 penalize, or attempt to refuse to give effect to, prevent, 801 prohibit, or penalize, any motor vehicle dealer or any 802 proprietor, partner, stockholder, owner, or other person who 803 holds or otherwise owns an interest therein from selling, 804 assigning, transferring, alienating, or otherwise disposing of, 805 in whole or in part, the equity interest of any of them in such 806 motor vehicle dealer to any other person or persons, including a 807 corporation established or existing for the purpose of owning or 808 holding the stock or ownership interests of other entities, 809 unless the licensee proves at a hearing pursuant to a complaint 810 filed by a motor vehicle dealer under this section that the 811 sale, transfer, alienation, or other disposition: 812 1.âIs to a person who is not, or whose controlling 813 executive management is not, of good moral character; or 814 2.âWould directly cause the licensee to be in violation of 815 s. 320.64(44). 816 (b)âA motor vehicle dealer, or any proprietor, partner, 817 stockholder, owner, or other person who holds or otherwise owns 818 an interest in the motor vehicle dealer, who desires to sell, 819 assign, transfer, alienate, or otherwise dispose of any interest 820 in such motor vehicle dealer shall notify, or cause the proposed 821 transferee to so notify, the licensee, in writing, of the 822 identity and address of the proposed transferee. A licensee who 823 receives such notice may, within 60 days following such receipt, 824 notify the motor vehicle dealer in writing that the proposed 825 transferee is not a person qualified to be a transferee under 826 this section and setting forth the material reasons for such 827 rejection. Failure of the licensee to notify the motor vehicle 828 dealer within the 60-day period of such rejection shall be 829 deemed an approval of the transfer. Any person whose proposed 830 sale of stock is rejected may file within 60 days of receipt of 831 such rejection a complaint with the department alleging that the 832 rejection was in violation of the law or the franchise 833 agreement. The licensee has the burden of proof with respect to 834 all issues raised by such complaint. The department shall 835 determine, and enter an order providing, that the proposed 836 transferee either is qualified or is not and cannot be qualified 837 for specified reasons; or the order may provide the conditions 838 under which a proposed transferee would be qualified. If the 839 licensee fails to file a response to the motor vehicle dealerâs 840 complaint within 30 days of receipt of the complaint, unless the 841 parties agree in writing to an extension, or if the department, 842 after a hearing, renders a decision on the complaint other than 843 one disqualifying the proposed transferee, the transfer shall be 844 deemed approved in accordance with the determination and order 845 rendered, effective upon compliance by the proposed transferee 846 with any conditions set forth in the determination or order. 847 (c)(b)âNotwithstanding paragraph (a), a licensee may not 848 reject a proposed transfer of a legal, equitable, or beneficial 849 interest in a motor vehicle dealer to a trust or other entity, 850 or to any beneficiary thereof, which is established by an owner 851 of any interest in a motor vehicle dealer for purposes of estate 852 planning, if the controlling person of the trust or entity, or 853 the beneficiary, is of good moral character. 854 Section 15.âSubsection (2) of section 320.95, Florida 855 Statutes, is amended to read: 856 320.95âTransactions by electronic or telephonic means.â 857 (2)âThe department may collect e-mail electronic mail 858 addresses and use e-mail electronic mail in lieu of the United 859 States Postal Service as a method of notification for the 860 purpose of providing renewal notices. 861 Section 16.âSubsection (44) of section 322.01, Florida 862 Statutes, is amended to read: 863 322.01âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 864 (44)ââTank vehicleâ means a commercial motor vehicle that 865 is designed to transport any liquid or gaseous material within 866 one or more tanks that each have an individual rated capacity of 867 more than 119 gallons and an aggregate rated capacity of 1,000 868 gallons or more and that are a tank either permanently or 869 temporarily attached to the vehicle or chassis. The term does 870 not include a commercial motor vehicle transporting an empty 871 storage tank that is not designed for transportation but that is 872 temporarily attached to a flatbed trailer, if such tank has a 873 designed capacity of 1,000 gallons or more. 874 Section 17.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 875 322.051, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 876 322.051âIdentification cards.â 877 (1)âAny person who is 5 years of age or older, or any 878 person who has a disability, regardless of age, who applies for 879 a disabled parking permit under s. 320.0848, may be issued an 880 identification card by the department upon completion of an 881 application and payment of an application fee. 882 (a)âThe application must include the following information 883 regarding the applicant: 884 1.âFull name (first, middle or maiden, and last), gender, 885 proof of social security card number satisfactory to the 886 department, which may include a military identification card, 887 county of residence, mailing address, e-mail address, proof of 888 residential address satisfactory to the department, country of 889 birth, and a brief description. 890 2.âProof of birth date satisfactory to the department. 891 3.âProof of identity satisfactory to the department. Such 892 proof must include one of the following documents issued to the 893 applicant: 894 a.âA driver license record or identification card record 895 from another jurisdiction that required the applicant to submit 896 a document for identification which is substantially similar to 897 a document required under sub-subparagraph b., sub-subparagraph 898 c., sub-subparagraph d., sub-subparagraph e., sub-subparagraph 899 f., sub-subparagraph g., or sub-subparagraph h.; 900 b.âA certified copy of a United States birth certificate; 901 c.âA valid, unexpired United States passport; 902 d.âA naturalization certificate issued by the United States 903 Department of Homeland Security; 904 e.âA valid, unexpired alien registration receipt card 905 (green card); 906 f.âA Consular Report of Birth Abroad provided by the United 907 States Department of State; 908 g.âAn unexpired employment authorization card issued by the 909 United States Department of Homeland Security; or 910 h.âProof of nonimmigrant classification provided by the 911 United States Department of Homeland Security, for an original 912 identification card. In order to prove nonimmigrant 913 classification, an applicant must provide at least one of the 914 following documents. In addition, the department may require 915 applicants to produce United States Department of Homeland 916 Security documents for the sole purpose of establishing the 917 maintenance of, or efforts to maintain, continuous lawful 918 presence: 919 (I)âA notice of hearing from an immigration court 920 scheduling a hearing on any proceeding. 921 (II)âA notice from the Board of Immigration Appeals 922 acknowledging pendency of an appeal. 923 (III)âA notice of the approval of an application for 924 adjustment of status issued by the United States Citizenship and 925 Immigration Services. 926 (IV)âAn official documentation confirming the filing of a 927 petition for asylum or refugee status or any other relief issued 928 by the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. 929 (V)âA notice of action transferring any pending matter from 930 another jurisdiction to Florida, issued by the United States 931 Citizenship and Immigration Services. 932 (VI)âAn order of an immigration judge or immigration 933 officer granting relief that authorizes the alien to live and 934 work in the United States, including, but not limited to, 935 asylum. 936 (VII)âEvidence that an application is pending for 937 adjustment of status to that of an alien lawfully admitted for 938 permanent residence in the United States or conditional 939 permanent resident status in the United States, if a visa number 940 is available having a current priority date for processing by 941 the United States Citizenship and Immigration Services. 942 (VIII)âOn or after January 1, 2010, an unexpired foreign 943 passport with an unexpired United States Visa affixed, 944 accompanied by an approved I-94, documenting the most recent 945 admittance into the United States. 946 947 An identification card issued based on documents required in 948 sub-subparagraph g. or sub-subparagraph h. is valid for a period 949 not to exceed the expiration date of the document presented or 1 950 year, whichever occurs first. 951 Section 18.âSubsection (1) of section 322.17, Florida 952 Statutes, is amended to read: 953 322.17âReplacement licenses and permits.â 954 (1)(a)âIn the event that an instruction permit or driver 955 license issued under the provisions of this chapter is lost or 956 destroyed, the person to whom the same was issued may, upon 957 payment of the appropriate fee pursuant to s. 322.21, obtain a 958 replacement upon furnishing proof satisfactory to the department 959 that such permit or license has been lost or destroyed, and 960 further furnishing the full name, date of birth, sex, residence 961 and mailing address, e-mail address, proof of birth satisfactory 962 to the department, and proof of identity satisfactory to the 963 department. 964 (b)âIn the event that an instruction permit or driver 965 license issued under the provisions of this chapter is stolen, 966 the person to whom the same was issued may, at no charge, obtain 967 a replacement upon furnishing proof satisfactory to the 968 department that such permit or license was stolen and further 969 furnishing the full name, date of birth, sex, residence and 970 mailing address, e-mail address, proof of birth satisfactory to 971 the department, and proof of identity satisfactory to the 972 department. 973 Section 19.âSubsections (1), (2), (3), and (6) of section 974 322.251, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 975 322.251âNotice of cancellation, suspension, revocation, or 976 disqualification of license.â 977 (1)âAll orders of cancellation, suspension, revocation, or 978 disqualification issued under the provisions of this chapter, 979 chapter 318, chapter 324, or ss. 627.732-627.734 must shall be 980 given either by personal delivery thereof to the licensee whose 981 license is being canceled, suspended, revoked, or disqualified; 982 or by deposit in the United States mail in an envelope, first 983 class, postage prepaid, addressed to the licensee at his or her 984 last known mailing address furnished to the department; or by e 985 mail notification if authorized by the licensee. Such methods of 986 notification mailing by the department constitute notice 987 constitutes notification, and any failure by the person to 988 receive the mailed order does will not affect or stay the 989 effective date or term of the cancellation, suspension, 990 revocation, or disqualification of the licenseeâs driving 991 privilege. 992 (2)âThe giving of notice and an order of cancellation, 993 suspension, revocation, or disqualification by mail is complete 994 upon expiration of 20 days after e-mail notification or deposit 995 in the United States mail for all notices except those issued 996 under chapter 324 or ss. 627.732â627.734, which are complete 15 997 days after e-mail notification or deposit in the United States 998 mail. Proof of the giving of notice and an order of 999 cancellation, suspension, revocation, or disqualification in 1000 such either manner must shall be made by entry in the records of 1001 the department that such notice was given. The entry is 1002 admissible in the courts of this state and constitutes 1003 sufficient proof that such notice was given. 1004 (3)âWhenever the driving privilege is suspended, revoked, 1005 or disqualified under the provisions of this chapter, the period 1006 of such suspension, revocation, or disqualification must shall 1007 be indicated on the order of suspension, revocation, or 1008 disqualification, and the department shall require the licensee 1009 whose driving privilege is suspended, revoked, or disqualified 1010 to surrender all licenses then held by him or her to the 1011 department. However, if should the person fails fail to 1012 surrender such licenses, the suspension, revocation, or 1013 disqualification period does shall not expire until a period 1014 identical to the period for which the driving privilege was 1015 suspended, revoked, or disqualified has expired after the date 1016 of surrender of the licenses, or the date an affidavit swearing 1017 such licenses are lost has been filed with the department. In 1018 any instance where notice of the suspension, revocation, or 1019 disqualification order is given mailed as provided herein, and 1020 the license is not surrendered to the department, and such 1021 license thereafter expires, the department may shall not renew 1022 that license until a period of time identical to the period of 1023 such suspension, revocation, or disqualification imposed has 1024 expired. 1025 (6)âWhenever a cancellation, suspension, revocation, or 1026 disqualification occurs, the department shall enter the 1027 cancellation, suspension, revocation, or disqualification order 1028 on the licenseeâs driver file 20 days after e-mail notification 1029 or deposit the notice was actually placed in the United States 1030 mail. Any inquiry into the file after the 20-day period shall 1031 reveal that the license is canceled, suspended, revoked, or 1032 disqualified and whether the license has been received by the 1033 department. 1034 Section 20.âParagraphs (a) and (i) of subsection (3) and 1035 paragraphs (b), (d), and (r) of subsection (7) of section 1036 337.401, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1037 337.401âUse of right-of-way for utilities subject to 1038 regulation; permit; fees.â 1039 (3)(a)âBecause of the unique circumstances applicable to 1040 providers of communications services, including, but not limited 1041 to, the circumstances described in paragraph (e) and the fact 1042 that federal and state law require the nondiscriminatory 1043 treatment of providers of telecommunications services, and 1044 because of the desire to promote competition among providers of 1045 communications services, it is the intent of the Legislature 1046 that municipalities and counties treat providers of 1047 communications services in a nondiscriminatory and competitively 1048 neutral manner when imposing rules or regulations governing the 1049 placement or maintenance of communications facilities in the 1050 public roads or rights-of-way. Rules or regulations imposed by a 1051 municipality or county relating to providers of communications 1052 services placing or maintaining communications facilities in its 1053 roads or rights-of-way must be generally applicable to all 1054 providers of communications services, taking into account the 1055 distinct engineering, construction, operation, maintenance, 1056 public works, and safety requirements of the providerâs 1057 facilities, and, notwithstanding any other law, may not require 1058 a provider of communications services to apply for or enter into 1059 an individual license, franchise, or other agreement with the 1060 municipality or county as a condition of placing or maintaining 1061 communications facilities in its roads or rights-of-way. In 1062 addition to other reasonable rules or regulations that a 1063 municipality or county may adopt relating to the placement or 1064 maintenance of communications facilities in its roads or rights 1065 of-way under this subsection or subsection (7), a municipality 1066 or county may require a provider of communications services that 1067 places or seeks to place facilities in its roads or rights-of 1068 way to register with the municipality or county. To register, a 1069 provider of communications services may be required only to 1070 provide its name; the name, address, and telephone number of a 1071 contact person for the registrant; the number of the 1072 registrantâs current certificate of authorization issued by the 1073 Florida Public Service Commission, the Federal Communications 1074 Commission, or the Department of State; a statement of whether 1075 the registrant is a pass-through provider as defined in 1076 subparagraph (6)(a)1.; the registrantâs federal employer 1077 identification number; and any required proof of insurance or 1078 self-insuring status adequate to defend and cover claims. A 1079 municipality or county may not require a registrant to renew a 1080 registration more frequently than every 5 years but may require 1081 during this period that a registrant update the registration 1082 information provided under this subsection within 90 days after 1083 a change in such information. A municipality or county may not 1084 require the registrant to provide an inventory of communications 1085 facilities, maps, locations of such facilities, or other 1086 information by a registrant as a condition of registration, 1087 renewal, or for any other purpose; provided, however, that a 1088 municipality or county may require as part of a permit 1089 application that the applicant identify at-grade communications 1090 facilities within 50 feet of the proposed installation location 1091 for the placement of at-grade communications facilities. A 1092 municipality or county may not require that a provider locate or 1093 perform a survey of any facilities except its own or any right 1094 of-way boundary when requesting a permit consistent with chapter 1095 556. If the owner of a facility fails to locate their facilities 1096 as required under chapter 556, a provider may proceed with the 1097 work but must use reasonable care and detection equipment or 1098 other acceptable means to avoid damaging existing underground 1099 facilities. A municipality or county may not require a provider 1100 to pay any fee, cost, or other charge for registration or 1101 renewal thereof. A municipality or county may not limit the 1102 number of permits in any way, including by project size or by 1103 limiting the number of open permits or applications, provided 1104 that the permit is closed out within 45 days after the 1105 providerâs completion of work. A municipality or county may 1106 require the submission or maintenance of a bond or other 1107 financial instrument as set out in this section but may not 1108 require a cash deposit or other escrow, payment, or exaction as 1109 a condition of issuing a permit. It is the intent of the 1110 Legislature that the placement, operation, maintenance, 1111 upgrading, and extension of communications facilities not be 1112 unreasonably interrupted or delayed through the permitting or 1113 other local regulatory process. Except as provided in this 1114 chapter or otherwise expressly authorized by chapter 202, 1115 chapter 364, or chapter 610, a municipality or county may not 1116 adopt or enforce any ordinance, regulation, or requirement as to 1117 the placement or operation of communications facilities in a 1118 right-of-way by a communications services provider authorized by 1119 state or local law to operate in a right-of-way; regulate any 1120 communications services; or impose or collect any tax, fee, 1121 cost, charge, or exaction for the placement of communications 1122 facilities or the provision of communications services over the 1123 communications services providerâs communications facilities in 1124 a right-of-way. 1125 (i)âExcept as expressly provided in this section, this 1126 section does not modify the authority of municipalities and 1127 counties to levy the tax authorized in chapter 202 or the duties 1128 of providers of communications services under ss. 337.402 1129 337.404. This section does not apply to building permits, pole 1130 attachments, or private roads, private easements, and private 1131 rights-of-way, or building permits unrelated to the placement of 1132 communications facilities. 1133 (7) 1134 (b)âAs used in subsections (3)-(9) this subsection, the 1135 term: 1136 1.ââAntennaâ means communications equipment that transmits 1137 or receives electromagnetic radio frequency signals used in 1138 providing wireless services. 1139 2.ââApplicable codesâ means uniform building, fire, 1140 electrical, plumbing, or mechanical codes adopted by a 1141 recognized national code organization or local amendments to 1142 those codes enacted solely to address threats of destruction of 1143 property or injury to persons, and includes the National 1144 Electric Safety Code and the 2017 edition of the Florida 1145 Department of Transportation Utility Accommodation Manual. 1146 3.ââApplicantâ means a person who submits an application 1147 and is a wireless provider. 1148 4.ââApplicationâ means a request submitted by an applicant 1149 to an authority for a permit to collocate small wireless 1150 facilities, or to place a new utility pole used to support a 1151 small wireless facility, or place other communications 1152 facilities. An authorityâs permit application form or process 1153 must include all required permissions, however designated, 1154 required by the authority to grant a permit to place 1155 communications facilities, including, but not limited to, right 1156 of-way occupancy, building permits, electrical permits, or 1157 historic review. 1158 5.ââAuthorityâ means a county or municipality having 1159 jurisdiction and control of the rights-of-way of any public 1160 road. The term does not include the Department of 1161 Transportation. Rights-of-way under the jurisdiction and control 1162 of the department are excluded from this subsection. 1163 6.ââAuthority utility poleâ means a utility pole owned by 1164 an authority in the right-of-way. The term does not include a 1165 utility pole owned by a municipal electric utility, a utility 1166 pole used to support municipally owned or operated electric 1167 distribution facilities, or a utility pole located in the right 1168 of-way within: 1169 a.âA retirement community that: 1170 (I)âIs deed restricted as housing for older persons as 1171 defined in s. 760.29(4)(b); 1172 (II)âHas more than 5,000 residents; and 1173 (III)âHas underground utilities for electric transmission 1174 or distribution. 1175 b.âA municipality that: 1176 (I)âIs located on a coastal barrier island as defined in s. 1177 161.053(1)(b)3.; 1178 (II)âHas a land area of less than 5 square miles; 1179 (III)âHas less than 10,000 residents; and 1180 (IV)âHas, before July 1, 2017, received referendum approval 1181 to issue debt to finance municipal-wide undergrounding of its 1182 utilities for electric transmission or distribution. 1183 7.ââCollocateâ or âcollocationâ means to install, mount, 1184 maintain, modify, operate, or replace one or more wireless 1185 facilities on, under, within, or adjacent to a wireless support 1186 structure or utility pole. The term does not include the 1187 installation of a new utility pole or wireless support structure 1188 in the public rights-of-way. 1189 8.ââFCCâ means the Federal Communications Commission. 1190 9.ââMicro wireless facilityâ means a small wireless 1191 facility having dimensions no larger than 24 inches in length, 1192 15 inches in width, and 12 inches in height and an exterior 1193 antenna, if any, no longer than 11 inches. 1194 10.ââSmall wireless facilityâ means a wireless facility 1195 that meets the following qualifications: 1196 a.âEach antenna associated with the facility is located 1197 inside an enclosure of no more than 6 cubic feet in volume or, 1198 in the case of antennas that have exposed elements, each antenna 1199 and all of its exposed elements could fit within an enclosure of 1200 no more than 6 cubic feet in volume; and 1201 b.âAll other wireless equipment associated with the 1202 facility is cumulatively no more than 28 cubic feet in volume. 1203 The following types of associated ancillary equipment are not 1204 included in the calculation of equipment volume: electric 1205 meters, concealment elements, telecommunications demarcation 1206 boxes, ground-based enclosures, grounding equipment, power 1207 transfer switches, cutoff switches, vertical cable runs for the 1208 connection of power and other services, and utility poles or 1209 other support structures. 1210 11.ââUtility poleâ means a pole or similar structure that 1211 is used in whole or in part to provide communications services 1212 or for electric distribution, lighting, traffic control, 1213 signage, or a similar function. The term includes the vertical 1214 support structure for traffic lights but does not include a 1215 horizontal structure to which signal lights or other traffic 1216 control devices are attached and does not include a pole or 1217 similar structure 15 feet in height or less unless an authority 1218 grants a waiver for such pole. 1219 12.ââWireless facilityâ means equipment at a fixed location 1220 which enables wireless communications between user equipment and 1221 a communications network, including radio transceivers, 1222 antennas, wires, coaxial or fiber-optic cable or other cables, 1223 regular and backup power supplies, and comparable equipment, 1224 regardless of technological configuration, and equipment 1225 associated with wireless communications. The term includes small 1226 wireless facilities. The term does not include: 1227 a.âThe structure or improvements on, under, within, or 1228 adjacent to the structure on which the equipment is collocated; 1229 b.âWireline backhaul facilities; or 1230 c.âCoaxial or fiber-optic cable that is between wireless 1231 structures or utility poles or that is otherwise not immediately 1232 adjacent to or directly associated with a particular antenna. 1233 13.ââWireless infrastructure providerâ means a person who 1234 has been certificated under chapter 364 to provide 1235 telecommunications service or under chapter 610 to provide cable 1236 or video services in this state, or that personâs affiliate, and 1237 who builds or installs wireless communication transmission 1238 equipment, wireless facilities, or wireless support structures 1239 but is not a wireless services provider. 1240 14.ââWireless providerâ means a wireless infrastructure 1241 provider or a wireless services provider. 1242 15.ââWireless servicesâ means any services provided using 1243 licensed or unlicensed spectrum, whether at a fixed location or 1244 mobile, using wireless facilities. 1245 16.ââWireless services providerâ means a person who 1246 provides wireless services. 1247 17.ââWireless support structureâ means a freestanding 1248 structure, such as a monopole, a guyed or self-supporting tower, 1249 or another existing or proposed structure designed to support or 1250 capable of supporting wireless facilities. The term does not 1251 include a utility pole, pedestal, or other support structure for 1252 ground-based equipment not mounted on a utility pole and less 1253 than 5 feet in height. 1254 (d)âAn authority may require a registration process and 1255 permit fees in accordance with subsection (3). An authority 1256 shall accept applications for permits and shall process and 1257 issue permits subject to the following requirements: 1258 1.âAn authority may not directly or indirectly require an 1259 applicant to perform services unrelated to the collocation for 1260 which approval is sought, such as in-kind contributions to the 1261 authority, including reserving fiber, conduit, or pole space for 1262 the authority. 1263 2.âAn applicant may not be required to provide more 1264 information to obtain a permit than is necessary to demonstrate 1265 the applicantâs compliance with applicable codes for the 1266 placement of small wireless facilities in the locations 1267 identified in the application. An applicant may not be required 1268 to provide inventories, maps, or locations of communications 1269 facilities in the right-of-way other than as necessary to avoid 1270 interference with other at-grade or aerial facilities located at 1271 the specific location proposed for a small wireless facility or 1272 within 50 feet of such location. 1273 3.âAn authority may not: 1274 a.âRequire the placement of small wireless facilities on 1275 any specific utility pole or category of poles; 1276 b.âRequire the placement of multiple antenna systems on a 1277 single utility pole; 1278 c.âRequire a demonstration that collocation of a small 1279 wireless facility on an existing structure is not legally or 1280 technically possible as a condition for granting a permit for 1281 the collocation of a small wireless facility on a new utility 1282 pole except as provided in paragraph (i); 1283 d.âRequire compliance with an authorityâs provisions 1284 regarding placement of communications facilities, including 1285 small wireless facilities or a new utility poles pole used to 1286 support a small wireless facilities, facility in rights-of-way 1287 under the control of the department unless the authority has 1288 received a delegation from the department for the location of 1289 the small wireless facility or utility pole;, or require such 1290 compliance as a condition to receive a permit that is ancillary 1291 to the permit for collocation of a small wireless facility, 1292 including an electrical permit; 1293 e.âRequire a meeting before filing an application; 1294 f.âRequire direct or indirect public notification or a 1295 public meeting for the placement of communication facilities in 1296 the right-of-way; 1297 g.âLimit the size or configuration of a small wireless 1298 facility or any of its components, if the small wireless 1299 facility complies with the size limits in this subsection; 1300 h.âProhibit the installation of a new utility pole used to 1301 support the collocation of a small wireless facility if the 1302 installation otherwise meets the requirements of this 1303 subsection; or 1304 i.âRequire that any component of a small wireless facility 1305 be placed underground except as provided in paragraph (i); or 1306 j.âRequire compliance with provisions regarding the 1307 placement of communications facilities, including small wireless 1308 facilities or new utility poles used to support small wireless 1309 facilities, in rights-of-way not owned and controlled by the 1310 authority and public utility easements that are within areas not 1311 owned and controlled by the authority unless a permit delegation 1312 agreement exists between the authority and the owner of the 1313 right-of-way or area that contains the public utility easement. 1314 4.âSubject to paragraph (r), an authority may not limit the 1315 placement, by minimum separation distances, of small wireless 1316 facilities, utility poles on which small wireless facilities are 1317 or will be collocated, or other at-grade communications 1318 facilities. However, within 14 days after the date of filing the 1319 application, an authority may request that the proposed location 1320 of a small wireless facility be moved to another location in the 1321 right-of-way and placed on an alternative authority utility pole 1322 or support structure or placed on a new utility pole. The 1323 authority and the applicant may negotiate the alternative 1324 location, including any objective design standards and 1325 reasonable spacing requirements for ground-based equipment, for 1326 30 days after the date of the request. At the conclusion of the 1327 negotiation period, if the alternative location is accepted by 1328 the applicant, the applicant must notify the authority of such 1329 acceptance and the application shall be deemed granted for any 1330 new location for which there is agreement and all other 1331 locations in the application. If an agreement is not reached, 1332 the applicant must notify the authority of such nonagreement and 1333 the authority must grant or deny the original application within 1334 90 days after the date the application was filed. A request for 1335 an alternative location, an acceptance of an alternative 1336 location, or a rejection of an alternative location must be in 1337 writing and provided by electronic mail. 1338 5.âAn authority shall limit the height of a small wireless 1339 facility to 10 feet above the utility pole or structure upon 1340 which the small wireless facility is to be collocated. Unless 1341 waived by an authority, the height for a new utility pole is 1342 limited to the tallest existing utility pole as of July 1, 2017, 1343 located in the same right-of-way, other than a utility pole for 1344 which a waiver has previously been granted, measured from grade 1345 in place within 500 feet of the proposed location of the small 1346 wireless facility. If there is no utility pole within 500 feet, 1347 the authority shall limit the height of the utility pole to 50 1348 feet. 1349 6.âThe installation by a communications services provider 1350 of a utility pole in the public rights-of-way, other than a 1351 utility pole used to support a small wireless facility, is 1352 subject to authority rules or regulations governing the 1353 placement of utility poles in the public rights-of-way. 1354 7.âWithin 14 days after receiving an application, an 1355 authority must determine and notify the applicant by electronic 1356 mail as to whether the application is complete. If an 1357 application is deemed incomplete, the authority must 1358 specifically identify the missing information. An application is 1359 deemed complete if the authority fails to provide notification 1360 to the applicant within 14 days. 1361 8.âAn application must be processed on a nondiscriminatory 1362 basis. A complete application is deemed approved if an authority 1363 fails to approve or deny the application within 60 days after 1364 receipt of the application. If an authority does not use the 30 1365 day negotiation period provided in subparagraph 4., the parties 1366 may mutually agree to extend the 60-day application review 1367 period. The authority shall grant or deny the application at the 1368 end of the extended period. A permit issued pursuant to an 1369 approved application shall remain effective for 1 year unless 1370 extended by the authority. 1371 9.âAn authority must notify the applicant of approval or 1372 denial by electronic mail. An authority shall approve a complete 1373 application unless it does not meet the authorityâs applicable 1374 codes. If the application is denied, the authority must specify 1375 in writing the basis for denial, including the specific code 1376 provisions on which the denial was based, and send the 1377 documentation to the applicant by electronic mail on the day the 1378 authority denies the application. The applicant may cure the 1379 deficiencies identified by the authority and resubmit the 1380 application within 30 days after notice of the denial is sent to 1381 the applicant. The authority shall approve or deny the revised 1382 application within 30 days after receipt or the application is 1383 deemed approved. The review of a revised application is limited 1384 to the deficiencies cited in the denial. If an authority 1385 provides for administrative review of the denial of an 1386 application, the review must be complete and a written decision 1387 issued within 45 days after a written request for review is 1388 made. A denial must identify the specific code provisions on 1389 which the denial is based. If the administrative review is not 1390 complete within 45 days, the authority waives any claim 1391 regarding failure to exhaust administrative remedies in any 1392 judicial review of the denial of an application. 1393 10.âAn applicant seeking to collocate small wireless 1394 facilities within the jurisdiction of a single authority may, at 1395 the applicantâs discretion, file a consolidated application and 1396 receive a single permit for the collocation of up to 30 small 1397 wireless facilities. If the application includes multiple small 1398 wireless facilities, an authority may separately address small 1399 wireless facility collocations for which incomplete information 1400 has been received or which are denied. 1401 11.âAn authority may deny an application to collocate a 1402 small wireless facility or place a utility pole used to support 1403 a small wireless facility in the public rights-of-way if the 1404 proposed small wireless facility or utility pole used to support 1405 a small wireless facility: 1406 a.âMaterially interferes with the safe operation of traffic 1407 control equipment. 1408 b.âMaterially interferes with sight lines or clear zones 1409 for transportation, pedestrians, or public safety purposes. 1410 c.âMaterially interferes with compliance with the Americans 1411 with Disabilities Act or similar federal or state standards 1412 regarding pedestrian access or movement. 1413 d.âMaterially fails to comply with the 2017 edition of the 1414 Florida Department of Transportation Utility Accommodation 1415 Manual. 1416 e.âFails to comply with applicable codes. 1417 f.âFails to comply with objective design standards 1418 authorized under paragraph (r). 1419 12.âAn authority may adopt by ordinance provisions for 1420 insurance coverage, indemnification, force majeure, abandonment, 1421 authority liability, or authority warranties. Such provisions 1422 must be reasonable and nondiscriminatory and apply to all 1423 providers of communications services, including, if applicable, 1424 any local government or nonprofit providers. An authority may 1425 require a construction bond to secure restoration of the 1426 postconstruction rights-of-way to the preconstruction condition. 1427 However, such bond must be time-limited to not more than 18 1428 months after the construction to which the bond applies is 1429 completed, and such bond must be reasonably related to the cost 1430 to secure restoration of the rights-of-way. An authority may not 1431 limit the number of permits allowed under the same bond. For any 1432 financial obligation required by an authority allowed under this 1433 section, the authority may not limit the number of permits in 1434 any way, including by project size or by limiting the number of 1435 applications or open permits, provided that the permit is closed 1436 out within 45 days after the providerâs completion of work; may 1437 not impose additional requirements based on the scope or linear 1438 feet of the project; and shall accept, at the option of the 1439 applicant, a bond or a letter of credit or similar financial 1440 instrument issued by any financial institution that is 1441 authorized to do business within the United States and, provided 1442 that a claim against the financial instrument may be made by 1443 electronic means, including by facsimile. An authority may not 1444 require a deposit or escrow of cash as a condition of issuing a 1445 permit or compel the applicant to agree to any additional terms 1446 or agreements not specifically authorized by this act or 1447 directly related to the work set out in the application. A 1448 provider of communications services may add an authority to any 1449 existing bond, insurance policy, or other relevant financial 1450 instrument, and the authority must accept such proof of coverage 1451 without any conditions other than consent to venue for purposes 1452 of any litigation to which the authority is a party. An 1453 authority may not require a communications services provider to 1454 indemnify it for liabilities not caused by the provider, its 1455 agents, or its employees, including liabilities arising from the 1456 authorityâs negligence, gross negligence, or willful conduct by 1457 an unaffiliated third party. 1458 13.âCollocation of a small wireless facility on an 1459 authority utility pole does not provide the basis for the 1460 imposition of an ad valorem tax on the authority utility pole. 1461 14.âAn authority may reserve space on authority utility 1462 poles for future public safety uses. However, a reservation of 1463 space may not preclude collocation of a small wireless facility. 1464 If replacement of the authority utility pole is necessary to 1465 accommodate the collocation of the small wireless facility and 1466 the future public safety use, the pole replacement is subject to 1467 make-ready provisions and the replaced pole shall accommodate 1468 the future public safety use. 1469 15.âA structure granted a permit and installed pursuant to 1470 this subsection shall comply with chapter 333 and federal 1471 regulations pertaining to airport airspace protections. 1472 (r)âAn authority may require wireless providers to comply 1473 with objective design standards adopted by ordinance. The 1474 ordinance may only require: 1475 1.âA new utility pole that replaces an existing utility 1476 pole to be of substantially similar design, material, and color; 1477 2.âReasonable spacing requirements concerning the location 1478 of a ground-mounted component of a small wireless facility which 1479 does not exceed 15 feet from the associated support structure; 1480 or 1481 3.âA small wireless facility to meet reasonable location 1482 context, color, camouflage, and concealment requirements, 1483 subject to the limitations in this subsection; and 1484 4.âA new utility pole used to support a small wireless 1485 facility to meet reasonable location context, color, and 1486 material of the predominant utility pole type at the proposed 1487 location of the new utility pole. 1488 1489 Such design standards under this paragraph may be waived by the 1490 authority upon a showing that the design standards are not 1491 reasonably compatible for the particular location of a small 1492 wireless facility or utility pole or are technically infeasible 1493 or that the design standards impose an excessive expense. The 1494 waiver must be granted or denied within 45 days after the date 1495 of the request. An authority may not require landscaping, 1496 landscaping maintenance, or vegetation management other than 1497 that necessary for right-of-way restoration. 1498 Section 21.âParagraph (a) of subsection (8) of section 1499 120.80, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1500 120.80âExceptions and special requirements; agencies.â 1501 (8)âDEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.â 1502 (a)âDriver licenses.â 1503 1.âNotwithstanding s. 120.57(1)(a), hearings regarding 1504 driver licensing pursuant to chapter 322 need not be conducted 1505 by an administrative law judge assigned by the division. 1506 2.âNotwithstanding s. 120.60(5), cancellation, suspension, 1507 or revocation of a driver license shall be by personal delivery 1508 to the licensee or by first-class mail or e-mail as provided in 1509 s. 322.251. 1510 Section 22.âSection 207.003, Florida Statutes, is amended 1511 to read: 1512 207.003âPrivilege tax levied.âA tax for the privilege of 1513 operating any qualified commercial motor vehicle upon the public 1514 highways of this state shall be levied upon every motor carrier 1515 at a rate which includes the minimum rates provided in parts I 1516 III of chapter 206 on each gallon of diesel fuel or motor fuel 1517 used for the propulsion of a qualified commercial motor vehicle 1518 by such motor carrier within this the state. 1519 Section 23.âSection 207.008, Florida Statutes, is amended 1520 to read: 1521 207.008âRetention of records by motor carrier.âEach 1522 licensed registered motor carrier shall maintain and keep 1523 pertinent records and papers as may be required by the 1524 department for the reasonable administration of this chapter and 1525 shall preserve the records upon which each quarterly tax return 1526 is based for 4 years after following the due date or filing date 1527 of the return, whichever is later. 1528 Section 24.âSubsection (3) of section 207.011, Florida 1529 Statutes, is amended to read: 1530 207.011âInspection of records; hearings; forms; rules.â 1531 (3)âThe department, or any authorized agent thereof, may is 1532 authorized to examine the records, books, papers, and equipment 1533 of any motor carrier, any retail dealer of motor diesel fuels, 1534 and any wholesale distributor of diesel fuels or motor fuels 1535 which that are deemed necessary to verify the truth and accuracy 1536 of any statement, or report, or return and ascertain whether the 1537 tax imposed by this chapter has been paid. 1538 Section 25.âSection 207.013, Florida Statutes, is amended 1539 to read: 1540 207.013âSuits for collection of unpaid taxes, penalties, 1541 and interest.âUpon demand of the department, the Department of 1542 Legal Affairs or the state attorney for a judicial circuit shall 1543 bring appropriate actions, in the name of the state or in the 1544 name of the Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles in 1545 the capacity of its office, for the recovery of taxes, 1546 penalties, and interest due under this chapter; and judgment 1547 shall be rendered for the amount so found to be due together 1548 with costs. However, if it is shall be found as a fact that such 1549 claim for, or grant of, an exemption or credit was willful on 1550 the part of any motor carrier, retail dealer, or distributor of 1551 diesel fuel or motor fuel, judgment must shall be rendered for 1552 double the amount of the tax found to be due with costs. The 1553 department may employ an attorney at law to institute and 1554 prosecute proper proceedings to enforce payment of the taxes, 1555 penalties, and interest provided for by this chapter and may fix 1556 the compensation for the services of such attorney at law. 1557 Section 26.âSubsection (3) of section 207.014, Florida 1558 Statutes, is amended to read: 1559 207.014âDepartmental warrant for collection of unpaid 1560 taxes.â 1561 (3)âIn the event there is a contest or claim of any kind 1562 with reference to the property levied upon or the amount of 1563 taxes, costs, or penalties due, such contest or claim must shall 1564 be tried in the circuit court in and for the county in which the 1565 warrant was executed, as nearly as may be in the same manner and 1566 means as such contest or claim would have been tried in such 1567 court had the warrant originally issued upon a judgment rendered 1568 by such court. The warrant issued as provided in this section 1569 constitutes shall constitute prima facie evidence of the amount 1570 of taxes, interest, and penalties due to the state by the motor 1571 carrier,; and the burden of proof is shall be upon the motor 1572 carrier, retail dealer, or distributor of diesel fuel or motor 1573 fuel to show that the amounts or penalties were incorrect. 1574 Section 27.âSubsections (1) and (3) of section 207.023, 1575 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1576 207.023âAuthority to inspect vehicles, make arrests, seize 1577 property, and execute warrants.â 1578 (1)âAs a part of their responsibility when inspecting 1579 qualified motor commercial vehicles, the Department of Highway 1580 Safety and Motor Vehicles, the Department of Agriculture and 1581 Consumer Services, and the Department of Transportation shall 1582 ensure that all vehicles are properly qualified under the 1583 provisions of this chapter. 1584 (3)âQualified commercial motor vehicles owned or operated 1585 by any motor carrier who refuses to comply with this chapter may 1586 be seized by authorized agents or employees of the Department of 1587 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, the Department of Agriculture 1588 and Consumer Services, or the Department of Transportation; or 1589 authorized agents and employees of any of these departments also 1590 may seize property as set out in ss. 206.205, 206.21, and 1591 206.215. Upon such seizure, the property must shall be 1592 surrendered without delay to the sheriff of the county where the 1593 property was seized for further proceedings. 1594 Section 28.âSubsections (1) and (6) of section 207.0281, 1595 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1596 207.0281âRegistration; Cooperative reciprocal agreements 1597 between states.â 1598 (1)âThe Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles may 1599 enter into a cooperative reciprocal agreement, including, but 1600 not limited to, the International Fuel Tax fuel-tax Agreement, 1601 with another state or group of states for the administration of 1602 the tax imposed by this chapter. An agreement arrangement, 1603 declaration, or amendment is not effective until stated in 1604 writing and filed with the Department of Highway Safety and 1605 Motor Vehicles. 1606 (6)âThis section and the contents of any reciprocal 1607 agreement entered into under this section supersede all other 1608 fuel-tax requirements of this chapter for qualified commercial 1609 motor vehicles. 1610 Section 29.âParagraph (aa) of subsection (7) of section 1611 212.08, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1612 212.08âSales, rental, use, consumption, distribution, and 1613 storage tax; specified exemptions.âThe sale at retail, the 1614 rental, the use, the consumption, the distribution, and the 1615 storage to be used or consumed in this state of the following 1616 are hereby specifically exempt from the tax imposed by this 1617 chapter. 1618 (7)âMISCELLANEOUS EXEMPTIONS.âExemptions provided to any 1619 entity by this chapter do not inure to any transaction that is 1620 otherwise taxable under this chapter when payment is made by a 1621 representative or employee of the entity by any means, 1622 including, but not limited to, cash, check, or credit card, even 1623 when that representative or employee is subsequently reimbursed 1624 by the entity. In addition, exemptions provided to any entity by 1625 this subsection do not inure to any transaction that is 1626 otherwise taxable under this chapter unless the entity has 1627 obtained a sales tax exemption certificate from the department 1628 or the entity obtains or provides other documentation as 1629 required by the department. Eligible purchases or leases made 1630 with such a certificate must be in strict compliance with this 1631 subsection and departmental rules, and any person who makes an 1632 exempt purchase with a certificate that is not in strict 1633 compliance with this subsection and the rules is liable for and 1634 shall pay the tax. The department may adopt rules to administer 1635 this subsection. 1636 (aa)âQualified motor certain commercial vehicles.âAlso 1637 exempt is the sale, lease, or rental of a qualified commercial 1638 motor vehicle as defined in s. 207.002, when the following 1639 conditions are met: 1640 1.âThe sale, lease, or rental occurs between two commonly 1641 owned and controlled corporations; 1642 2.âSuch vehicle was titled and registered in this state at 1643 the time of the sale, lease, or rental; and 1644 3.âFlorida sales tax was paid on the acquisition of such 1645 vehicle by the seller, lessor, or renter. 1646 Section 30.âParagraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (4) of 1647 section 316.545, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1648 316.545âWeight and load unlawful; special fuel and motor 1649 fuel tax enforcement; inspection; penalty; review.â 1650 (4)(a)âA commercial vehicle may not be operated over the 1651 highways of this state unless it has been properly licensed 1652 registered under s. 207.004. Whenever any law enforcement 1653 officer identified in s. 207.023(1), upon inspecting the vehicle 1654 or combination of vehicles, determines that the vehicle is in 1655 violation of s. 207.004, a penalty in the amount of $50 shall be 1656 assessed, and the vehicle may be detained until payment is 1657 collected by the law enforcement officer. 1658 (b)âIn addition to the penalty provided for in paragraph 1659 (a), the vehicle may be detained until the owner or operator of 1660 the vehicle furnishes evidence that the vehicle has been 1661 properly licensed registered pursuant to s. 207.004. Any officer 1662 of the Florida Highway Patrol or agent of the Department of 1663 Transportation may issue a temporary fuel-use fuel use permit 1664 and collect the appropriate fee as provided for in s. 207.004(5) 1665 s. 207.004(4). Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (6), 1666 all permit fees collected pursuant to this paragraph shall be 1667 transferred to the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 1668 Vehicles to be allocated pursuant to s. 207.026. 1669 Section 31.âParagraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 1670 318.15, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1671 318.15âFailure to comply with civil penalty or to appear; 1672 penalty.â 1673 (1)(a)âIf a person fails to comply with the civil penalties 1674 provided in s. 318.18 within the time period specified in s. 1675 318.14(4), fails to enter into or comply with the terms of a 1676 penalty payment plan with the clerk of the court in accordance 1677 with ss. 318.14 and 28.246, fails to attend driver improvement 1678 school, or fails to appear at a scheduled hearing, the clerk of 1679 the court must notify the Department of Highway Safety and Motor 1680 Vehicles of such failure within 10 days after such failure. Upon 1681 receipt of such notice, the department must immediately issue an 1682 order suspending the driver license and privilege to drive of 1683 such person effective 20 days after the date the order of 1684 suspension is provided mailed in accordance with s. 322.251(1), 1685 (2), and (6). The order also must inform the person that he or 1686 she may contact the clerk of the court to establish a payment 1687 plan pursuant to s. 28.246(4) to make partial payments for 1688 court-related fines, fees, service charges, and court costs. Any 1689 such suspension of the driving privilege which has not been 1690 reinstated, including a similar suspension imposed outside of 1691 this state, must remain on the records of the department for a 1692 period of 7 years after from the date imposed and must be 1693 removed from the records after the expiration of 7 years after 1694 from the date it is imposed. The department may not accept the 1695 resubmission of such suspension. 1696 Section 32.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 1697 319.35, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1698 319.35âUnlawful acts in connection with motor vehicle 1699 odometer readings; penalties.â 1700 (1) 1701 (b)âIt is unlawful for any person to knowingly provide 1702 false information on the odometer readings required pursuant to 1703 ss. 319.23(3) and 320.02(2)(d) 320.02(2)(b). 1704 Section 33.âSubsection (3) of section 319.40, Florida 1705 Statutes, is amended to read: 1706 319.40âTransactions by electronic or telephonic means.â 1707 (3)âThe department may collect e-mail electronic mail 1708 addresses and use e-mail electronic mail in lieu of the United 1709 States Postal Service as a method of notification. However, any 1710 notice regarding the potential forfeiture or foreclosure of an 1711 interest in property must be sent via the United States Postal 1712 Service. 1713 Section 34.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 1714 320.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1715 320.03âRegistration; duties of tax collectors; 1716 International Registration Plan.â 1717 (5) 1718 (b)âUpon a tax collectorâs request, the department may 1719 provide ancillary technology to integrate other tax collection 1720 systems used by tax collectors in order to provide tax 1721 collectors with data access and uniform interface 1722 functionalities for registration renewal transactions performed 1723 at a tax collectorâs office or online via a tax collectorâs 1724 website. The department shall prescribe the best manner of 1725 delivering the data access and uniform interface functionalities 1726 to tax collectors for the purpose of processing registration 1727 renewal transactions and shall provide the ability to record and 1728 process registration renewal transactions in the state system in 1729 real time and bulk data reporting for vehicle registrations, 1730 including each applicantâs e-mail electronic mail address 1731 collected pursuant to s. 320.95. Such data and functionality may 1732 be used only for purposes of fulfilling the tax collectorâs 1733 statutory duties pursuant to this chapter, chapter 319, chapter 1734 322, or chapter 328 and may not be resold or used for any other 1735 purpose. Such data access and uniform interface functionalities 1736 shall be developed no later than July 1, 2023. For the purposes 1737 of this paragraph, the term âregistration renewal transactionsâ 1738 means issuance of motor vehicle, mobile home, and trailer 1739 registration certificates, registration license plates, and 1740 validation stickers. 1741 Section 35.âSubsection (10) of section 322.08, Florida 1742 Statutes, is amended to read: 1743 322.08âApplication for license; requirements for license 1744 and identification card forms.â 1745 (10)âThe department may collect e-mail electronic mail 1746 addresses and use e-mail electronic mail in lieu of the United 1747 States Postal Service as a method of notification for the 1748 purpose of providing renewal notices. 1749 Section 36.âParagraph (a) of subsection (8) of section 1750 322.18, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1751 322.18âOriginal applications, licenses, and renewals; 1752 expiration of licenses; delinquent licenses.â 1753 (8)âThe department shall issue 8-year renewals using a 1754 convenience service without reexamination to drivers who have 1755 not attained 80 years of age. The department shall issue 6-year 1756 renewals using a convenience service when the applicant has 1757 satisfied the requirements of subsection (5). 1758 (a)âIf the department determines from its records that the 1759 holder of a license about to expire is eligible for renewal, the 1760 department must shall mail a renewal notice to the licensee at 1761 his or her last known address or provide a renewal notice to the 1762 licensee by e-mail notification at least, not less than 30 days 1763 before prior to the licenseeâs birthday. The renewal notice must 1764 shall direct the licensee to appear at a driver license office 1765 for in-person renewal or to transmit the completed renewal 1766 notice and the fees required by s. 322.21 to the department 1767 using a convenience service. 1768 Section 37.âSubsection (4) of section 322.21, Florida 1769 Statutes, is amended to read: 1770 322.21âLicense fees; procedure for handling and collecting 1771 fees.â 1772 (4)âIf the department determines from its records or is 1773 otherwise satisfied that the holder of a license about to expire 1774 is entitled to have it renewed, the department must shall mail a 1775 renewal notice to the licensee at his or her last known address 1776 or provide a renewal notice to the licensee by e-mail 1777 notification at least, within 30 days before the licenseeâs 1778 birthday. The licensee must shall be issued a renewal license, 1779 after reexamination, if required, during the 30 days immediately 1780 preceding his or her birthday upon presenting a renewal notice, 1781 his or her current license, and the fee for renewal to the 1782 department at any driver license examining office. 1783 Section 38.âSubsection (3) and paragraph (a) of subsection 1784 (5) of section 322.245, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1785 322.245âSuspension of license upon failure of person 1786 charged with specified offense under chapter 316, chapter 320, 1787 or this chapter to comply with directives ordered by traffic 1788 court or upon failure to pay child support in non-IV-D cases as 1789 provided in chapter 61 or failure to pay any financial 1790 obligation in any other criminal case.â 1791 (3)âIf the person fails to comply with the directives of 1792 the court within the 30-day period, or, in non-IV-D cases, fails 1793 to comply with the requirements of s. 61.13016 within the period 1794 specified in that statute, the depository or the clerk of the 1795 court must electronically notify the department of such failure 1796 within 10 days. Upon electronic receipt of the notice, the 1797 department shall immediately issue an order suspending the 1798 personâs driver license and privilege to drive effective 20 days 1799 after the date the order of suspension is provided mailed in 1800 accordance with s. 322.251(1), (2), and (6). The order of 1801 suspension must also contain information specifying that the 1802 person may contact the clerk of the court to establish a payment 1803 plan pursuant to s. 28.246(4) to make partial payments for 1804 fines, fees, service charges, and court costs. 1805 (5)(a)âWhen the department receives notice from a clerk of 1806 the court that a person licensed to operate a motor vehicle in 1807 this state under the provisions of this chapter has failed to 1808 pay financial obligations for any criminal offense other than 1809 those specified in subsection (1), in full or in part under a 1810 payment plan pursuant to s. 28.246(4), the department must 1811 suspend the license of the person named in the notice. The 1812 department shall provide mail an order of suspension in 1813 accordance with s. 322.251(1), (2), and (6), which must also 1814 contain information specifying that the person may contact the 1815 clerk of the court to establish a payment plan pursuant to s. 1816 28.246(4) to make partial payments for fines, fees, service 1817 charges, and court costs. 1818 Section 39.âSubsections (3) and (5) of section 322.2615, 1819 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 1820 322.2615âSuspension of license; right to review.â 1821 (3)âIf the department determines that the license should be 1822 suspended pursuant to this section and if the notice of 1823 suspension has not already been served upon the person by a law 1824 enforcement officer or correctional officer as provided in 1825 subsection (1), the department shall issue a notice of 1826 suspension and, unless the notice is provided mailed pursuant to 1827 s. 322.251, a temporary permit that expires 10 days after the 1828 date of issuance if the driver is otherwise eligible. 1829 (5)âAfter completion of the informal review, notice of the 1830 departmentâs decision sustaining, amending, or invalidating the 1831 suspension of the driver license of the person whose license was 1832 suspended must be provided to such person. Such notice must be 1833 mailed to the person at the last known address shown on the 1834 departmentâs records, mailed or to the address provided in the 1835 law enforcement officerâs report if such address differs from 1836 the address of record, or e-mailed to the e-mail address 1837 furnished to the department within 21 days after the expiration 1838 of the temporary permit issued pursuant to subsection (1) or 1839 subsection (3). 1840 Section 40.âSubsection (4) of section 322.2616, Florida 1841 Statutes, is amended to read: 1842 322.2616âSuspension of license; persons under 21 years of 1843 age; right to review.â 1844 (4)âIf the department finds that the license of the person 1845 should be suspended under this section and if the notice of 1846 suspension has not already been served upon the person by a law 1847 enforcement officer or correctional officer as provided in 1848 subsection (2), the department must shall issue a notice of 1849 suspension and, unless the notice is provided mailed under s. 1850 322.251, a temporary driving permit that expires 10 days after 1851 the date of issuance if the driver is otherwise eligible. 1852 Section 41.âSubsection (3) of section 322.64, Florida 1853 Statutes, is amended to read: 1854 322.64âHolder of commercial driver license; persons 1855 operating a commercial motor vehicle; driving with unlawful 1856 blood-alcohol level; refusal to submit to breath, urine, or 1857 blood test.â 1858 (3)âIf the department determines that the person arrested 1859 should be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle 1860 pursuant to this section and if the notice of disqualification 1861 has not already been served upon the person by a law enforcement 1862 officer or correctional officer as provided in subsection (1), 1863 the department must shall issue a notice of disqualification 1864 and, unless the notice is provided mailed pursuant to s. 1865 322.251, a temporary permit which expires 10 days after the date 1866 of issuance if the driver is otherwise eligible. 1867 Section 42.âSubsection (1) of section 324.091, Florida 1868 Statutes, is amended to read: 1869 324.091âNotice to department; notice to insurer.â 1870 (1)âEach owner and operator involved in a crash or 1871 conviction case within the purview of this chapter shall furnish 1872 evidence of automobile liability insurance or motor vehicle 1873 liability insurance within 14 days after the date of providing 1874 the mailing of notice of crash by the department in the form and 1875 manner as it may designate. Upon receipt of evidence that an 1876 automobile liability policy or motor vehicle liability policy 1877 was in effect at the time of the crash or conviction case, the 1878 department shall forward to the insurer such information for 1879 verification in a method as determined by the department. The 1880 insurer shall respond to the department within 20 days after the 1881 notice whether or not such information is valid. If the 1882 department determines that an automobile liability policy or 1883 motor vehicle liability policy was not in effect and did not 1884 provide coverage for both the owner and the operator, it must 1885 shall take action as it is authorized to do under this chapter. 1886 Section 43.âParagraph (c) of subsection (1) of section 1887 324.171, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1888 324.171âSelf-insurer.â 1889 (1)âAny person may qualify as a self-insurer by obtaining a 1890 certificate of self-insurance from the department which may, in 1891 its discretion and upon application of such a person, issue said 1892 certificate of self-insurance when such person has satisfied the 1893 requirements of this section to qualify as a self-insurer under 1894 this section: 1895 (c)âThe owner of a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in 1896 s. 207.002 or s. 320.01 or a qualified motor vehicle as defined 1897 in s. 207.002, may qualify as a self-insurer subject to the 1898 standards provided for in subparagraph (b)2. 1899 Section 44.âSubsection (3) of section 328.30, Florida 1900 Statutes, is amended to read: 1901 328.30âTransactions by electronic or telephonic means.â 1902 (3)âThe department may collect e-mail electronic mail 1903 addresses and use e-mail electronic mail in lieu of the United 1904 States Postal Service as a method of notification for the 1905 purpose of providing renewal notices. 1906 Section 45.âParagraph (b) of subsection (1) of section 1907 328.73, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1908 328.73âRegistration; duties of tax collectors.â 1909 (1) 1910 (b)âUpon a tax collectorâs request, the department may 1911 provide ancillary technology to integrate other tax collection 1912 systems used by tax collectors in order to provide tax 1913 collectors with data access and uniform interface 1914 functionalities for registration renewal transactions performed 1915 at a tax collectorâs office or online via a tax collectorâs 1916 website. The department shall prescribe the best manner of 1917 delivering the data access and uniform interface functionalities 1918 to tax collectors for the purpose of processing registration 1919 renewal transactions and shall provide the ability to record and 1920 process registration renewal transactions in the state system in 1921 real time and bulk data reporting for vessel registrations, 1922 including each applicantâs e-mail electronic mail address 1923 collected pursuant to s. 328.30. Such data and functionality may 1924 be used only for purposes of fulfilling the tax collectorâs 1925 statutory duties pursuant to this chapter, chapter 319, chapter 1926 320, or chapter 322 and may not be resold or used for any other 1927 purpose. Such data access and uniform interface functionalities 1928 shall be developed no later than July 1, 2023. For the purposes 1929 of this paragraph, the term âregistration renewal transactionsâ 1930 means vessel registration certificates, vessel numbers, and 1931 decals. 1932 Section 46.âSection 627.7415, Florida Statutes, is amended 1933 to read: 1934 627.7415âCommercial motor vehicles and qualified motor 1935 vehicles; additional liability insurance coverage.âCommercial 1936 motor vehicles, as defined in s. 207.002 or s. 320.01 and 1937 qualified motor vehicles as defined in s. 207.002, operated upon 1938 the roads and highways of this state must shall be insured with 1939 the following minimum levels of combined bodily liability 1940 insurance and property damage liability insurance in addition to 1941 any other insurance requirements: 1942 (1)âFifty thousand dollars per occurrence for a commercial 1943 motor vehicle or qualified motor vehicle with a gross vehicle 1944 weight of 26,000 pounds or more, but less than 35,000 pounds. 1945 (2)âOne hundred thousand dollars per occurrence for a 1946 commercial motor vehicle or qualified motor vehicle with a gross 1947 vehicle weight of 35,000 pounds or more, but less than 44,000 1948 pounds. 1949 (3)âThree hundred thousand dollars per occurrence for a 1950 commercial motor vehicle or qualified motor vehicle with a gross 1951 vehicle weight of 44,000 pounds or more. 1952 (4)âAll commercial motor vehicles and qualified motor 1953 vehicles subject to regulations of the United States Department 1954 of Transportation, 49 C.F.R. part 387, subparts A and B, and as 1955 may be hereinafter amended, must shall be insured in an amount 1956 equivalent to the minimum levels of financial responsibility as 1957 set forth in such regulations. 1958 1959 A violation of this section is a noncriminal traffic infraction, 1960 punishable as a nonmoving violation as provided in chapter 318. 1961 Section 47.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.